pl.aff
FLAG long
SFX H1   nąć       liby      [^aąeęioóu]znąć
SFX H1   ąć        ęłyby     [^n]ąć
SFX H1   nąć       łyby      [^aąeęioóu]znąć
SFX H1   ąć        ęlibyście [^n]ąć
SFX H1   nąć       libyście  [^aąeęioóu]znąć
SFX H1   ąć        ęłybyście [^n]ąć
SFX H1   nąć       łybyście  [^aąeęioóu]znąć
SFX H1   ąć        ęlibyśmy  [^n]ąć
SFX H1   nąć       libyśmy   [^aąeęioóu]znąć
SFX H1   ąć        ęłybyśmy  [^n]ąć
SFX H1   nąć       łybyśmy   [^aąeęioóu]znąć
SFX H1   ść        dłem      aść
SFX H1   ść        dłam      aść
SFX H1   ść        dłeś      aść
SFX H1   ść        dłaś      aść
SFX H1   ść        dł        aść
SFX H1   ść        dła       aść
SFX H1   ść        dło       aść
SFX H1   ść        dliśmy    aść
SFX H1   ść        dłyśmy    aść
SFX H1   ść        dliście   aść
SFX H1   ść        dłyście   aść
SFX H1   ść        dli       aść
SFX H1   ść        dły       aść
SFX H1   ść        dłbym     aść
SFX H1   ść        dłabym    aść
SFX H1   ść        dłbyś     aść
SFX H1   ść        dłabyś    aść
SFX H1   ść        dłby      aść
SFX H1   ść        dłaby     aść
SFX H1   ść        dłoby     aść
SFX H1   ść        dliby     aść
SFX H1   ść        dłyby     aść
SFX H1   ść        dlibyście aść
SFX H1   ść        dłybyście aść
SFX H1   ść        dlibyśmy  aść
SFX H1   ść        dłybyśmy  aść
SFX H1   ąść       adłem     [^z]ąść
SFX H1   ąść       adłam     [^z]ąść
SFX H1   ąść       adłeś     [^z]ąść
SFX H1   ąść       adłaś     [^z]ąść
SFX H1   ąść       adł       [^z]ąść
SFX H1   ąść       adła      [^z]ąść
SFX H1   ąść       adło      [^z]ąść
SFX H1   ąść       edliśmy   [^z]ąść
SFX H1   ąść       adłyśmy   [^z]ąść
SFX H1   ąść       edliście  [^z]ąść
SFX H1   ąść       adłyście  [^z]ąść
SFX H1   ąść       edli      [^z]ąść
SFX H1   ąść       adły      [^z]ąść
SFX H1   ąść       adłbym    [^z]ąść
SFX H1   ąść       adłabym   [^z]ąść
SFX H1   ąść       adłbyś    [^z]ąść
SFX H1   ąść       adłabyś   [^z]ąść
SFX H1   ąść       adłby     [^z]ąść
SFX H1   ąść       adłaby    [^z]ąść
SFX H1   ąść       adłoby    [^z]ąść
SFX H1   ąść       edliby    [^z]ąść
SFX H1   ąść       adłyby    [^z]ąść
SFX H1   ąść       edlibyście [^z]ąść
SFX H1   ąść       adłybyście [^z]ąść
SFX H1   ąść       edlibyśmy [^z]ąść
SFX H1   ąść       adłybyśmy [^z]ąść
SFX H1   ąść       ądłem     ząść
SFX H1   ąść       ędłam     ząść
SFX H1   ąść       ądłeś     ząść
SFX H1   ąść       ędłaś     ząść
SFX H1   ąść       ądł       ząść
SFX H1   ąść       ędła      ząść
SFX H1   ąść       ędło      ząść
SFX H1   ąść       ędliśmy   ząść
SFX H1   ąść       ędłyśmy   ząść
SFX H1   ąść       ędliście  ząść
SFX H1   ąść       ędłyście  ząść
SFX H1   ąść       ędli      ząść
SFX H1   ąść       ędły      ząść
SFX H1   ąść       ądłbym    ząść
SFX H1   ąść       ędłabym   ząść
SFX H1   ąść       ądłbyś    ząść
SFX H1   ąść       ędłabyś   ząść
SFX H1   ąść       ądłby     ząść
SFX H1   ąść       ędłaby    ząść
SFX H1   ąść       ędłoby    ząść
SFX H1   ąść       ędliby    ząść
SFX H1   ąść       ędłyby    ząść
SFX H1   ąść       ędlibyście ząść
SFX H1   ąść       ędłybyście ząść
SFX H1   ąść       ędlibyśmy ząść
SFX H1   ąść       ędłybyśmy ząść
SFX H1   eść       odłem     [^mn]ieść
SFX H1   eść       odłam     [^mn]ieść
SFX H1   eść       odłeś     [^mn]ieść
SFX H1   eść       odłaś     [^mn]ieść
SFX H1   eść       ódł       [^mn]ieść
SFX H1   eść       odła      [^mn]ieść
SFX H1   eść       odło      [^mn]ieść
SFX H1   eść       edliśmy   [^mn]ieść
SFX H1   eść       odłyśmy   [^mn]ieść
SFX H1   eść       edliście  [^mn]ieść
SFX H1   eść       odłyście  [^mn]ieść
SFX H1   eść       edli      [^mn]ieść
SFX H1   eść       odły      [^mn]ieść
SFX H1   eść       ódłbym    [^mn]ieść
SFX H1   eść       odłabym   [^mn]ieść
SFX H1   eść       ódłbyś    [^mn]ieść
SFX H1   eść       odłabyś   [^mn]ieść
SFX H1   eść       ódłby     [^mn]ieść
SFX H1   eść       odłaby    [^mn]ieść
SFX H1   eść       odłoby    [^mn]ieść
SFX H1   eść       edliby    [^mn]ieść
SFX H1   eść       odłyby    [^mn]ieść
SFX H1   eść       edlibyście [^mn]ieść
SFX H1   eść       odłybyście [^mn]ieść
SFX H1   eść       edlibyśmy [^mn]ieść
SFX H1   eść       odłybyśmy [^mn]ieść
SFX H1   eść       osłem     [mn]ieść
SFX H1   eść       osłam     [mn]ieść
SFX H1   eść       osłeś     [mn]ieść
SFX H1   eść       osłaś     [mn]ieść
SFX H1   eść       ósł       [mn]ieść
SFX H1   eść       osła      [mn]ieść
SFX H1   eść       osło      [mn]ieść
SFX H1   ść        śliśmy    [mn]ieść
SFX H1   eść       osłyśmy   [mn]ieść
SFX H1   ść        śliście   [mn]ieść
SFX H1   eść       osłyście  [mn]ieść
SFX H1   ść        śli       [mn]ieść
SFX H1   eść       osły      [mn]ieść
SFX H1   eść       ósłbym    [mn]ieść
SFX H1   eść       osłabym   [mn]ieść
SFX H1   eść       ósłbyś    [mn]ieść
SFX H1   eść       osłabyś   [mn]ieść
SFX H1   eść       ósłby     [mn]ieść
SFX H1   eść       osłaby    [mn]ieść
SFX H1   eść       osłoby    [mn]ieść
SFX H1   ść        śliby     [mn]ieść
SFX H1   eść       osłyby    [mn]ieść
SFX H1   ść        ślibyście [mn]ieść
SFX H1   eść       osłybyście [mn]ieść
SFX H1   ść        ślibyśmy  [mn]ieść
SFX H1   eść       osłybyśmy [mn]ieść
SFX H1   eść       adłem     jeść
SFX H1   eść       adłam     jeść
SFX H1   eść       adłeś     jeść
SFX H1   eść       adłaś     jeść
SFX H1   eść       adł       jeść
SFX H1   eść       adła      jeść
SFX H1   eść       adło      jeść
SFX H1   ść        dliśmy    jeść
SFX H1   eść       adłyśmy   jeść
SFX H1   ść        dliście   jeść
SFX H1   eść       adłyście  jeść
SFX H1   ść        dli       jeść
SFX H1   eść       adły      jeść
SFX H1   eść       adłbym    jeść
SFX H1   eść       adłabym   jeść
SFX H1   eść       adłbyś    jeść
SFX H1   eść       adłabyś   jeść
SFX H1   eść       adłby     jeść
SFX H1   eść       adłaby    jeść
SFX H1   eść       adłoby    jeść
SFX H1   ść        dliby     jeść
SFX H1   eść       adłyby    jeść
SFX H1   ść        dlibyście jeść
SFX H1   eść       adłybyście jeść
SFX H1   ść        dlibyśmy  jeść
SFX H1   eść       adłybyśmy jeść
SFX H1   eść       otłem     leść
SFX H1   eść       otłam     leść
SFX H1   eść       otłeś     leść
SFX H1   eść       otłaś     leść
SFX H1   eść       ótł       leść
SFX H1   eść       otła      leść
SFX H1   eść       otło      leść
SFX H1   ść        śliśmy    leść
SFX H1   eść       otłyśmy   leść
SFX H1   ść        śliście   leść
SFX H1   eść       otłyście  leść
SFX H1   ść        śli       leść
SFX H1   eść       otły      leść
SFX H1   eść       ótłbym    leść
SFX H1   eść       otłabym   leść
SFX H1   eść       ótłbyś    leść
SFX H1   eść       otłabyś   leść
SFX H1   eść       ótłby     leść
SFX H1   eść       otłaby    leść
SFX H1   eść       otłoby    leść
SFX H1   ść        śliby     leść
SFX H1   eść       otłyby    leść
SFX H1   ść        ślibyście leść
SFX H1   eść       otłybyście leść
SFX H1   ść        ślibyśmy  leść
SFX H1   eść       otłybyśmy leść
SFX H1   jść       szedłem   [^e]jść
SFX H1   jść       szłam     [^e]jść
SFX H1   jść       szedłeś   [^e]jść
SFX H1   jść       szłaś     [^e]jść
SFX H1   jść       szedł     [^e]jść
SFX H1   jść       szła      [^e]jść
SFX H1   jść       szło      [^e]jść
SFX H1   jść       szliśmy   [^e]jść
SFX H1   jść       szłyśmy   [^e]jść
SFX H1   jść       szliście  [^e]jść
SFX H1   jść       szłyście  [^e]jść
SFX H1   jść       szli      [^e]jść
SFX H1   jść       szły      [^e]jść
SFX H1   jść       szedłbym  [^e]jść
SFX H1   jść       szłabym   [^e]jść
SFX H1   jść       szedłbyś  [^e]jść
SFX H1   jść       szłabyś   [^e]jść
SFX H1   jść       szedłby   [^e]jść
SFX H1   jść       szłaby    [^e]jść
SFX H1   jść       szłoby    [^e]jść
SFX H1   jść       szliby    [^e]jść
SFX H1   jść       szłyby    [^e]jść
SFX H1   jść       szlibyście [^e]jść
SFX H1   jść       szłybyście [^e]jść
SFX H1   jść       szlibyśmy [^e]jść
SFX H1   jść       szłybyśmy [^e]jść
SFX H1   ejść      szedłem   [^bdw]ejść
SFX H1   ejść      szłam     [^bdw]ejść
SFX H1   ejść      szedłeś   [^bdw]ejść
SFX H1   ejść      szłaś     [^bdw]ejść
SFX H1   ejść      szedł     [^bdw]ejść
SFX H1   ejść      szła      [^bdw]ejść
SFX H1   ejść      szło      [^bdw]ejść
SFX H1   ejść      szliśmy   [^bdw]ejść
SFX H1   ejść      szłyśmy   [^bdw]ejść
SFX H1   ejść      szliście  [^bdw]ejść
SFX H1   ejść      szłyście  [^bdw]ejść
SFX H1   ejść      szli      [^bdw]ejść
SFX H1   ejść      szły      [^bdw]ejść
SFX H1   ejść      szedłbym  [^bdw]ejść
SFX H1   ejść      szłabym   [^bdw]ejść
SFX H1   ejść      szedłbyś  [^bdw]ejść
SFX H1   ejść      szłabyś   [^bdw]ejść
SFX H1   ejść      szedłby   [^bdw]ejść
SFX H1   ejść      szłaby    [^bdw]ejść
SFX H1   ejść      szłoby    [^bdw]ejść
SFX H1   ejść      szliby    [^bdw]ejść
SFX H1   ejść      szłyby    [^bdw]ejść
SFX H1   ejść      szlibyście [^bdw]ejść
SFX H1   ejść      szłybyście [^bdw]ejść
SFX H1   ejść      szlibyśmy [^bdw]ejść
SFX H1   ejść      szłybyśmy [^bdw]ejść
SFX H1   ejść      szedłem   [bdw]ejść
SFX H1   ejść      szedłeś   [bdw]ejść
SFX H1   ejść      szedł     [bdw]ejść
SFX H1   jść       szłam     [bdw]ejść
SFX H1   jść       szłaś     [bdw]ejść
SFX H1   jść       szła      [bdw]ejść
SFX H1   jść       szło      [bdw]ejść
SFX H1   jść       szliśmy   [bdw]ejść
SFX H1   jść       szłyśmy   [bdw]ejść
SFX H1   jść       szliście  [bdw]ejść
SFX H1   jść       szłyście  [bdw]ejść
SFX H1   jść       szli      [bdw]ejść
SFX H1   jść       szły      [bdw]ejść
SFX H1   ejść      szedłbym  [bdw]ejść
SFX H1   ejść      szedłbyś  [bdw]ejść
SFX H1   ejść      szedłby   [bdw]ejść
SFX H1   jść       szłabym   [bdw]ejść
SFX H1   jść       szłabyś   [bdw]ejść
SFX H1   jść       szłaby    [bdw]ejść
SFX H1   jść       szłoby    [bdw]ejść
SFX H1   jść       szliby    [bdw]ejść
SFX H1   jść       szłyby    [bdw]ejść
SFX H1   jść       szlibyście [bdw]ejść
SFX H1   jść       szłybyście [bdw]ejść
SFX H1   jść       szlibyśmy [bdw]ejść
SFX H1   jść       szłybyśmy [bdw]ejść
SFX H1   źć        złem      yźć
SFX H1   źć        złam      yźć
SFX H1   źć        złeś      yźć
SFX H1   źć        złaś      yźć
SFX H1   źć        zł        yźć
SFX H1   źć        zła       yźć
SFX H1   źć        zło       yźć
SFX H1   ć         liśmy     yźć
SFX H1   źć        złyśmy    yźć
SFX H1   ć         liście    yźć
SFX H1   źć        złyście   yźć
SFX H1   ć         li        yźć
SFX H1   źć        zły       yźć
SFX H1   źć        złbym     yźć
SFX H1   źć        złabym    yźć
SFX H1   źć        złbyś     yźć
SFX H1   źć        złabyś    yźć
SFX H1   źć        złby      yźć
SFX H1   źć        złaby     yźć
SFX H1   źć        złoby     yźć
SFX H1   ć         liby      yźć
SFX H1   źć        złyby     yźć
SFX H1   ć         libyście  yźć
SFX H1   źć        złybyście yźć
SFX H1   ć         libyśmy   yźć
SFX H1   źć        złybyśmy  yźć
SFX H1   eźć       azłem     [^i]eźć
SFX H1   eźć       azłam     [^i]eźć
SFX H1   eźć       azłeś     [^i]eźć
SFX H1   eźć       azłaś     [^i]eźć
SFX H1   eźć       azł       [^i]eźć
SFX H1   eźć       azła      [^i]eźć
SFX H1   eźć       azło      [^i]eźć
SFX H1   ć         liśmy     [^i]eźć
SFX H1   eźć       azłyśmy   [^i]eźć
SFX H1   ć         liście    [^i]eźć
SFX H1   eźć       azłyście  [^i]eźć
SFX H1   ć         li        [^i]eźć
SFX H1   eźć       azły      [^i]eźć
SFX H1   eźć       azłbym    [^i]eźć
SFX H1   eźć       azłabym   [^i]eźć
SFX H1   eźć       azłbyś    [^i]eźć
SFX H1   eźć       azłabyś   [^i]eźć
SFX H1   eźć       azłby     [^i]eźć
SFX H1   eźć       azłaby    [^i]eźć
SFX H1   eźć       azłoby    [^i]eźć
SFX H1   ć         liby      [^i]eźć
SFX H1   eźć       azłyby    [^i]eźć
SFX H1   ć         libyście  [^i]eźć
SFX H1   eźć       azłybyście [^i]eźć
SFX H1   ć         libyśmy   [^i]eźć
SFX H1   eźć       azłybyśmy [^i]eźć
SFX H1   eźć       ozłem     ieźć
SFX H1   eźć       ozłam     ieźć
SFX H1   eźć       ozłeś     ieźć
SFX H1   eźć       ozłaś     ieźć
SFX H1   eźć       ózł       ieźć
SFX H1   eźć       ozła      ieźć
